Massachusetts, session 194th, H2950.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 7 of chapter 4 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following new paragraph:- 
“Sixtieth “Police officer”, “policeman”, or “permanent member of a police force”, shall 
include without limitation, any police officer appointed by the University of Massachusetts, 
Environmental police, Massport police, and campus police officers of the state colleges and 
universities. 
SECTION 2. Section 94 of chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting  
after the words “Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority,” the following words:- or of the 

of 2 9 University of Massachusetts police department, Environmental police, Massport police, and 
campus police officers of the state colleges and universities. 
SECTION 3. Section 111F of chapter 41of the General Laws, is hereby amended by 
inserting after the word:- “General Edward Lawrence Logan International Airport, and members 
of the Massachusetts military reservation fire department, for the purposes of this section the 
Massachusetts Port Authority and Massachusetts military reservation shall be fire districts,” the 
following:- The provisions of this section shall also apply in all aspects to any University of 
Massachusetts police officer, Environmental police, Massport police, and campus police officer 
of the state colleges and universities